Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 7. Stalking

Law Reviews —

For note, “Closing the Loophole: Vermont’s Legislative Response to Stalking,” see 18 Vt. L. Rev. 477 (1994).

§ 1061.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens, or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s property. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(1) (A) “Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens, or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s property. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the person directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), threaten shall not be construed to require an express or overt threat.

“Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or distress that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional treatment or counseling.

“Reasonable person” means a reasonable person in the victim’s circumstances.

“Stalk” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that the person engaging in the conduct knows or should know would cause a reasonable person to fear for his or her safety or the safety of another or would cause a reasonable person substantial emotional distress.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 95, § 1; amended 1999, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 3; 2005, No. 83, § 4; 2013, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

Particular cases.

There is no basis in the stalking statute to require that the perpetrator’s act and the victim’s fear be contemporaneous. Thus, because the victim stated that she was fearful after learning that petitioner had been caught peeping through her bedroom window, it was error to vacate his aggravated stalking conviction. In re Hoch, 2013 VT 83, 194 Vt. 575, 82 A.3d 1167, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 82 (2013).

In a stalking case, there was no merit to defendant’s argument that the complainant’s testimony at trial regarding her fear of defendant was not credible because it contradicted her statements to the police and her testimony at the motion to dismiss hearing. Through cross-examination, defendant demonstrated the alleged inconsistencies in the complainant’s reports to the police, her testimony at the pretrial hearing, and her testimony at trial; it was up to the jury to decide whether the complainant’s testimony regarding her fear of defendant was credible. State v. Hinchliffe, 2009 VT 111, 186 Vt. 487, 987 A.2d 988, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 121 (2009).

In prosecution of defendant for violating an abuse prevention order, an instruction that the jury could find that he had violated the order if it found that he had “followed or stalked” the victim was not plain error since the instruction defined the terms “following” and “stalk” in much the same way as those terms are defined in the stalking statute and the evidence relating to alternative theories under which a jury could convict was intertwined throughout the trial. State v. Prior, 2007 VT 1, 181 Vt. 564, 917 A.2d 466, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 1 (2007) (mem.).

Defendant failed in his argument that a post-conviction amendment to Vermont’s stalking statute mandated that he receive a new trial because, aside from defendant’s mere assertion that clarifying amendments are procedural per se, this suggested exception to the statutory provision on the retroactive effect of statutory amendments is unsupported by statutes or case law and the court declined to adopt it. State v. Van Aelstyn, 2007 VT 6, 181 Vt. 274, 917 A.2d 471, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 4, cert. denied, 552 U.S. 814, 128 S. Ct. 68, 169 L. Ed. 2d 17, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 10280 (2007).

§ 1062.
Stalking.

Any person who intentionally stalks another person shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 95, § 1.

§ 1063.
Aggravated stalking.

A person commits the crime of aggravated stalking if the person intentionally stalks another person, and:

such conduct violates a court order that prohibits stalking and is in effect at the time of the offense;

has been previously convicted of stalking or aggravated stalking;

has been previously convicted of an offense an element of which involves an act of violence against the same person;

the person being stalked is under 16 years of age; or

had a deadly weapon, as defined in section 1021 of this title, in his or her possession while engaged in the act of stalking.

A person who commits the crime of aggravated stalking shall be imprisoned not more than five years or be fined not more than $25,000.00, or both.

Conduct constituting the offense of aggravated stalking shall be considered a violent act for the purposes of determining bail.

HISTORY:

Added 1993, No. 95, § 1; amended 2005, No. 83, § 5; 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1064.
Defenses.

In a prosecution under this subchapter, it shall not be a defense that the defendant was not provided actual notice that the course of conduct was unwanted.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 162 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.